Maryland, session 2025, HB0963.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0963*

HOUSE BILL 963
21–803.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (3) through (5) of this subsection, if,
on the basis of an engineering and traffic investigation, a local authority determines that
any maximum speed limit specified in this subtitle is greater or less than reasonable or
safe under existing conditions on any part of a highway in its jurisdiction, it may establish
a reasonable and safe maximum speed limit for that part of the highway, which may:
(i) Decrease the limit at an intersection;
(ii) Increase the limit in an urban district to not more than 50 miles
per hour;
(iii) Decrease the limit in an urban district; or
(iv) Decrease the limit outside an urban district to not less than 25
miles per hour.
(4) (i) This paragraph applies only to:
1. Anne Arundel County and Montgomery County; and
2. Municipalities located in Anne Arundel County and
Montgomery County.
(ii) 1. [A] SUBJECT TO SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH, A local authority may decrease the maximum speed limit to not less than
15 miles per hour on a highway only after performing an engineering and traffic
investigation.
2. IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY, A LOCAL AUTHORITY MAY
DECREASE THE MAXIMUM SPEED LIMIT ON A HIGHWAY UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH
1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH WITHOUT PERFORMING AN ENGINEERING AND TRAFFIC
INVESTIGATION.
(iii) A local authority may not implement a new speed monitoring
system to enforce speed limits on any portion of a highway for which the speed limit has
been decreased under this paragraph.
(c) An altered maximum speed limit established under this section is effective
when posted on appropriate signs giving notice of the limit.
(d) Except in Baltimore City, any alteration by a local authority of a maximum
speed limit on a part or extension of a State highway is not effective until it is approved by
the State Highway Administration.

HOUSE BILL 963 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.